Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in and Contributions to the Fund

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-13-2.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-14-1.

47-17-40.
Application for membership in the fund; credit for prior service.

In order to obtain membership in the fund, a peace officer shall make application to the board upon an application form to be furnished by it for that purpose. It shall be the duty of the employing authority to notify the board within 30 days from the date a peace officer is employed, furnishing the name and mailing address of such peace officer. The board shall furnish an application form to such peace officer within 15 days after such notification. The application form shall be accompanied by such material and information as will enable the peace officer to determine the benefits to be derived by virtue of said peace officer’s membership in the fund. An applicant must furnish proof of the date of such applicant’s birth, and such proof shall be in such form as shall be required by the board.

Reserved.

In addition to the requirements stated in this Code section, an application for membership shall contain such other information as may be required by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 9; Ga. L. 1951, p. 472, §§ 3, 3A; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 574, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, §§ 3, 8; Ga. L. 1958, p. 341, § 4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, § 4; Ga. L. 1965, p. 593, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 536, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 74, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1067, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1491, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1000, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 320, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-17-41.
Retention of membership during absence from employment as a peace officer; credit for such period; payments due from the member for such period.

The board may provide by rule and regulation for the retention of any legally qualified member who has temporarily ceased employment as a peace officer and for credit for such period, provided that an application for retention of membership is submitted not later than 90 days after such employment has ceased; and provided, further, that he or she shall pay to the fund the amounts required for such period. Such member may obtain one month of such credit for each month of active membership performed after the period of unemployment as a peace officer; provided, however, that not more than 12 months of absence from such employment shall be allowed under this Code section during a member’s entire membership in the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 472, § 5; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 13; Ga. L. 1958, p. 341, § 9; Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, § 8; Ga. L. 1963, p. 386, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 909, § 1/HB 974.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “or she” in the first sentence and substituted “Such member may obtain one month of such credit for each month of active membership performed after the period of unemployment as a peace officer; provided, however, that not” for “Not” at the beginning of the second sentence.

47-17-42.
Membership of peace officers blinded in the line of duty before creation of the fund; payments required of such peace officers; disability benefits available.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who was totally blinded in the line of duty as a peace officer prior to the creation of the fund and who has been unable to serve as a peace officer since that injury is authorized to become a member of the fund, regardless of whether such person is now or hereafter a peace officer. If he elects to join the fund, he shall pay into it the amount which he would have paid had he joined the fund upon its creation and continued as a member since that time, which amount shall be determined by the board. Upon such payment he shall be authorized to receive the maximum disability benefits under Code Section 47-17-81 without the necessity of complying with any time limitations contained in that Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 757, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

47-17-43.
Participation of members in other retirement, annuity, or benefit systems.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed so as to prevent any peace officer who is a member of the fund from belonging to any other retirement, annuity, or benefit system.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, § 14.

47-17-44.
Amount of dues; deadline and minimum period for payments; dues required for credit for service after March 1, 1951; dues required for prior service credit.

Beginning on July 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2021, each member shall pay monthly dues into the fund of $25.00.

On and after July 1, 2021, each member shall pay monthly dues into the fund in an amount to be determined annually by the board that shall be at least $25.00, but shall not exceed $50.00.

The base amount of monthly dues established pursuant to this paragraph shall apply uniformly to all members.

The board shall determine the monthly dues amount based on:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the minimum funding standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board declares relevant.

Each month’s dues shall be paid not later than the tenth day of that month.

Each member shall be required to pay such dues for a minimum period of ten years, or 15 years for individuals who became members on or after July 1, 2010, before being eligible to receive the retirement benefits under this chapter, provided that, if such member is eligible to retire under this chapter and so desires, such member may retire, and the board shall deduct such monthly amount from his or her retirement benefits until he or she has paid dues into the fund for a period of ten years or 15 years for individuals who became members on or after July 1, 2010.

No member shall receive credit for any service performed after March 1, 1951, unless such member has paid into the fund the amount required for such service. Upon application of any peace officer who applies for membership and who owes dues for service since March 1, 1951, the board may allow and provide for periodic payments of such dues over a period of not more than 36 months immediately subsequent to the date of his or her acceptance as a member.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, any member of the fund who has not obtained creditable service for prior service pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-17-70 may obtain such service by tendering to the board an amount equal to the dues at the rate of $20.00 per month plus 10 percent interest per annum compounded annually from the date the prior service was rendered to the date of payment for all years claimed as prior service; provided, however, that no member shall be allowed to purchase more than a total of five years of such creditable service; provided, further, however, that any member who becomes or again becomes a member of the fund on or after July 1, 1994, must have been an active member of the fund for five years or more to obtain the prior service credit provided for in this subsection.

Any member of the fund who qualifies for membership under the definition contained in subparagraph (J) of paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-17-1 who has not obtained creditable service for prior service pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-17-70 may obtain such service by tendering to the board an amount equal to the dues at the rate of $20.00 per month plus 10 percent interest per annum compounded annually from the date the prior service was rendered to the date of payment for all years claimed as prior service.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 50, § 9; Ga. L. 1951, p. 472, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 574, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 280, §§ 5, 7, 8; Ga. L. 1958, p. 341, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 39, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1965, p. 593, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 536, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 74, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 63, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1201, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1921, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 996, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1139, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 320, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 776, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 603, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 581, § 2/SB 249.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “Each member shall pay into the fund as dues the sum of $20.00 per month. Each month’s dues shall be paid not later than the tenth day of that month. Each member shall be required to pay such dues for a minimum period of ten years before being eligible to receive the retirement benefits under this chapter, provided that, if such member is eligible to retire under this chapter and so desires, such member may retire, and the board shall deduct such monthly amount from his or her retirement benefits until he or she has paid dues into the fund for a period of ten years.” See Editor’s notes for comment.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 581, § 5/SB 249, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2020, only if it is determined to have been concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law’; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2020, as required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.” However, the Act was not signed by the Governor until August 3, 2020. The State Auditor’s determination letter on concurrent funding of fiscal retirement bills provided: “[I]t is unclear as to the effective date of this bill. Based on the information received by the Fund’s actuary, Senate Bill 249 met the provisions for concurrent funding had it become effective on July 1, 2020.” See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 2020, p. 380A.